Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 5 Records Checks for Persons Supervising Children

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 662, § 1 and Ga. L. 1986, p. 669, § 1 both enacted an Article 4 of Chapter 5 of Title 49. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, the article enacted by the latter Act was redesignated as Article 5 of this chapter and the Code sections in this article, which were enacted as Code Sections 49-5-90 through 49-5-94, were redesignated as Code Sections 49-5-110 through 49-5-114, respectively.

49-5-110.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Conviction” means a finding or verdict of guilty or a plea of guilty.

“Crime” means a violation of Code Section 16-5-23 when the victim is a minor; a violation of Code Section 16-5-24 when the victim is a minor; a violation of Code Section 16-5-70; a violation of Code Section 16-12-1; a violation of Chapter 6 of Title 16, excluding the offenses of bigamy or marrying a bigamist; a felony violation of Chapter 13 of Title 16; a violation of Code Section 16-5-1; a violation of Code Section 16-4-1 as it concerns attempted murder; or any other offense committed in another jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be deemed to be one of the enumerated crimes listed in this paragraph.

“Criminal record” means:

Conviction of a crime;

Arrest, charge, and sentencing for a crime where adjudication or sentence was otherwise withheld or not entered on the charge; provided, however, that this subparagraph shall not apply to a violation of Chapter 13 of Title 16, relating to controlled substances, or any other offense committed in another jurisdiction which, if it were committed in this state, would be a violation of Chapter 13 of Title 16 if such violation or offense constituted only simple possession; or

Arrest and being charged for a crime if the charge is pending, unless the time for prosecuting such crime has expired pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 17.

“Employer” means any person, organization, corporation, or political subdivision which employs or uses the services of paid employees or volunteers in positions in which the employee or volunteer has supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children.

“GCIC” means the Georgia Crime Information Center established under Article 2 of Chapter 3 of Title 35.

“GCIC information” means criminal history record information as defined in Code Section 35-3-30.

“Records check” means a records check comparison of GCIC information.

“Records check application” means a set of classifiable fingerprints, a records search fee in an amount to be determined by the Georgia Bureau of Investigation to cover the reasonable cost of such records check, payable in such form as the GCIC may direct to cover the cost of a records check under this article, and an affidavit by the applicant consenting to a records check and disclosing the nature and date of any arrest, charge, or conviction of the applicant for the violation of any law, except for motor vehicle parking violations, whether or not the violation occurred in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 669, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 49/HB 79; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-58/HB 242.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in paragraph (2). See editor’s note for extent of application. The second 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, in paragraph (2), deleted “, relating to simple battery,” following “Code Section 16-5-23”, deleted “, relating to aggravated battery,” following “Code Section 16-5-24”, deleted “, relating to cruelty to children” following “Code Section 16-5-70”, deleted “, relating to contributing to the delinquency of a minor” following “Code Section 16-12-1”, deleted “, relating to sexual offenses” following “Chapter 6 of Title 16”, deleted “, relating to controlled substances” following “Chapter 13 of Title 16” deleted “, relating to murder and felony murder” following “Code Section 16-5-1”, and deleted “, relating to criminal attempt” following “Code Section 16-4-1”. See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 54(f)/HB79, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “In the event of a conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2013 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to paragraph (2) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 49(7)/HB 79 will not be given effect in this Code section effective January 1, 2014.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

49-5-111.
Employers authorized to make records checks; procedure; retention of fingerprints.

On and after July 1, 1986, an employer may require that a new or current employee or volunteer submit to a records check for the purpose of determining whether such person has ever been convicted of a crime or has a criminal record.

An employer seeking a records check on an employee shall submit a records check application to the GCIC. Upon receipt thereof, the GCIC shall promptly conduct a search of its records and records to which it has access. Within a reasonable time after receiving the application, the GCIC shall notify the employer in writing of any criminal record finding or of the fact of no such finding.

If the employer is participating in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall be authorized to retain fingerprints obtained pursuant to this article for such program and the employer shall notify the individual whose fingerprints were taken of the parameters of such retention.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-111

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 669, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 2-19/SB 336.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2018).

49-5-112.
Cooperation of law enforcement agencies; penalty for false information.

The GCIC and law enforcement agencies which have access to GCIC information shall cooperate with employers who are authorized to obtain records checks on their employees in performing such checks and shall provide such information for such records checks notwithstanding any other law to the contrary and may charge reasonable fees therefor.

Any person who knowingly and under false pretenses requests, obtains, or attempts to obtain GCIC information otherwise authorized to be obtained pursuant to this article, or who knowingly communicates or attempts to communicate such information obtained pursuant to this article to any person or entity except in accordance with this article, or who knowingly uses or attempts to use such information obtained pursuant to this article for any purpose other than as authorized by this article shall be fined not more than $5,000.00, imprisoned for not more than two years, or both.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-112

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 669, § 1.

49-5-113.
Personal liability; disciplinary action.

Other than for a knowing and malicious release of false information, neither GCIC, any law enforcement agency, nor the employees of any such entities shall be responsible for the accuracy of information nor have any liability for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any dissemination of information or determination based thereon pursuant to this article. However, no employee shall be suspended or dismissed from such employee’s job due to any information provided in a records check until the employer obtains a certified copy of the original documents on which the charges identified in the records check are based.

An employer shall have no liability for defamation, invasion of privacy, or any other claim based upon good faith action thereby pursuant to the provisions of this article. Any disciplinary action of any kind taken against any local school board employee and based in whole or in part on information obtained through a records check as provided in this article shall be subject to and governed by the provisions of Code Section 20-2-940.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-113

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 669, § 1.

49-5-114.
Other laws requiring records checks.

This article shall be cumulative of and in addition to any other law requiring or permitting employees’ records checks and shall not relieve any person from any duty or requirement under such other laws.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-114

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 669, § 1.

49-5-115.
Letter issued by Department of Early Care and Learning in lieu of background screening or fingerprint checks.

In lieu of any background screening or fingerprint check required pursuant to any state law or any department regulation for an individual who provides short-term care for a child in the custody of the department, the department is authorized to accept a letter issued within the previous 12 months by the Department of Early Care and Learning stating that such individual has received a satisfactory determination by the Department of Early Care and Learning in accordance with Article 2 of Chapter 1A of Title 20.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-115

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 481, § 1/HB 250.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 8, 2017.